Utah statutes.
53A-11-301.   Certificate of immunization required.
(1)  Unless exempted for personal, medical, or religious objections as
provided in Section 53A-11-302, a student may not attend a public, private, or
parochial kindergarten, elementary, or secondary school through grade 12,
nursery school, licensed day care center, child care facility, family care
home, or headstart program in this state unless there is presented to the
appropriate official of the school a certificate of immunization from a
licensed physician or authorized representative of the state or local health
department stating that the student has received immunization against
communicable diseases as required by rules adopted under Section 53A-11-303.
(2)  School districts may not receive weighted pupil unit money for a student
unless the student has obtained a certificate of immunization under this
section or qualifies for conditional enrollment or an exemption from
immunization under Section 53A-11-302.
